Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4164.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. County fiscal obligations; report A. Notwithstanding any other law, for fiscal year 2026-2027, a county with a population of less than two hundred fifty thousand persons according to the 2020 United States decennial census may meet any county fiscal obligation from any source of county revenue designated by the county, including monies of any countywide special taxing jurisdiction of which the board of supervisors serves as the board of directors. Under the authority provided in this subsection, a county may not use more than $1,250,000 for purposes other than the purposes of the revenue source. B. On or before October 1, 2026, each county with a population of less than two hundred fifty thousand persons according to the 2020 United States decennial census shall report to the director of the joint legislative budget committee whether the county used a revenue source for purposes other than the purposes of the revenue source to meet a county fiscal obligation pursuant to subsection A of this section and, if so, the specific revenue source and amount of revenues that the county intends to use in fiscal year 2026-2027. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 13, 2026.